Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Collection of Documentary Drafts.

Sec. 45.04.501.
Handling of documentary drafts; duty to send for presentment and to notify customer of dishonor.

A bank that takes a documentary draft for collection must present or send the draft and accompanying documents for presentment and, upon learning that the draft has not been paid or accepted in due course, must seasonably notify its customer of this fact even though it may have discounted or bought the draft or extended credit available for withdrawal as of right.

History.

(§ 4.501 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.04.502.
Presentment of “on arrival” drafts.

If a draft or the relevant instructions require presentment “on arrival,” “when goods arrive,” or the like, the collecting bank need not present until in its judgment a reasonable time for arrival of the goods has expired. Refusal to pay or accept because the goods have not arrived is not dishonor; the bank must notify its transferor of this refusal, but need not present the draft again until it is instructed to do so or learns of the arrival of the goods.

History.

(§ 4.502 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.04.503.
Responsibility of presenting bank for documents and goods; report of reasons for dishonor; referee in case of need.

Unless otherwise instructed and except as provided in AS 45.05, a bank presenting a documentary draft

must deliver the documents to the drawee on acceptance of the draft if it is payable more than three days after presentment; otherwise, only on payment; and

upon dishonor, either in the case of presentment for acceptance or presentment for payment, may seek and follow instructions from a referee in case of need designated in the draft or, if the presenting bank does not choose to use a referee’s services, it must use diligence and good faith to ascertain the reason for dishonor, must notify its transferor of the dishonor and of the results of its effort to ascertain the reasons for dishonor, and must request instructions.

A presenting bank is under no obligation with respect to goods represented by the documents except to follow reasonable instructions seasonably received; it has a right to reimbursement for expenses incurred in following instructions and to prepayment of or indemnity for these expenses.

History.

(§ 4.503 ch 114 SLA 1962)

Sec. 45.04.504.
Privilege of presenting bank to deal with goods; security interest for expenses.

A presenting bank that, following the dishonor of a documentary draft, seasonably requests instructions but does not receive them within a reasonable time, may store, sell, or otherwise deal with the goods in a reasonable manner.

For its reasonable expenses incurred by action under (a) of this section, the presenting bank has a lien upon the goods or their proceeds, which may be foreclosed in the same manner as an unpaid seller’s lien.

History.

(§ 4.504 ch 114 SLA 1962)